Hawaii statutes.
[§587D-3] Safe place for newborns.
(a) The personnel of a hospital, fire station, or police station, or emergency
services personnel may receive a newborn child; provided that the newborn child
was born within seventy-two hours of being left at the hospital, fire station,
or police station, or with emergency services personnel as determined within a
reasonable degree of medical certainty.

(b) When a person leaves a newborn child with
the personnel of [a] hospital, fire station, or police station, or emergency
services personnel, the personnel:

(1) Shall make every reasonable effort to solicit the
following information from the person leaving the newborn child:

(A) The name of the newborn child;

(B) The name and address of the parent or
person dropping off the newborn child;

(C) The location where the newborn child was
born;

(D) Information pertaining to the newborn
child's medical history;

(E) The newborn child's biological family's
medical history, including major illnesses and diseases; and

(F) Any other information that might
reasonably assist the department in determining the best interests of the
newborn child, including whether the parents plan on returning to seek custody
of the child in the future;

provided that refusal of the person leaving the
newborn child to provide such information shall not prevent personnel from
accepting the newborn child;

(2) May provide the person leaving the newborn child
with information on how to contact relevant social service agencies; and

(3) Shall notify appropriate law enforcement agencies
that a newborn child was received, for purposes of matching the child with
missing children reports.

(c) If a hospital, fire station, or police
station, or emergency services personnel receives a newborn child pursuant to
subsection (a), any health care provider, firefighter, police officer, or
emergency services personnel receiving the newborn child shall perform any act
necessary, in accordance with generally accepted standards of their respective
professional practice, to protect, preserve, and aid the physical health and
safety of the newborn child during the temporary physical custody. [L Sp 2007,
c 7, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next